Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.170

Only active members may practice law.

No person shall practice law in this state subsequent to the first meeting of the state bar unless he or she shall be an active member thereof as hereinbefore defined: PROVIDED, That a member of the bar in good standing in any other state or jurisdiction shall be entitled to appear in the courts of this state under such rules as the board of governors may prescribe.

[ 2011 c 336 s 67; 1933 c 94 s 13; RRS s 138-13.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Admission—APR 5.